Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska37-308
Rules and regulations; hunting, fishing, and trapping; use of weapons; violation; penalty.

The commission may adopt and promulgate rules and regulations, temporarily or permanently, permitting hunting, fishing, or the public use of firearms, bow and arrow, or any other projectile weapons or devices on any area or any portion of any area under its ownership or control. The commission may enact special rules and regulations permitting trapping and other forms of fur harvesting on any such area or areas. Any person who, without the permission of the commission, hunts, fishes, traps, harvests fur, or uses firearms, bow and arrow, or any other projectile weapon or device on any area or any portion of any area under the ownership or control of the commission shall be guilty of a Class V misdemeanor.

Laws 1998, LB 922, § 66.